Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202632-1034
Abstract of votes; election officials; duties.

Immediately upon the completion of the canvass by the county canvassing board, the election commissioner or county clerk shall prepare an abstract of votes for all officers and issues certified to the election commissioner or county clerk by the Secretary of State. The election commissioner or county clerk shall sign and affix his or her official seal to the abstract as the Abstract of Votes of ......... County and deliver it to the Secretary of State in person or via mail, electronic mail, or facsimile transmission by the third Monday after the election. If delivered via electronic mail or facsimile transmission, the original abstract shall be received by the Secretary of State by the fourth Wednesday following the election. The Secretary of State shall prepare a tabular sheet of the votes cast for such officers and measures and preserve the same with the abstract of votes from the various counties for the use of the Legislature and the board of state canvassers in making the official canvass. The Secretary of State shall deliver to the state chairperson of each political party, upon request, a separate abstract of votes of the various contests for national and state offices indicating the total votes received by each candidate and measure.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 328;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 35.
April 16, 2026
County clerk is required to furnish abstract of votes for use of the Legislature in making official canvass. State ex rel. Caldwell v. Peterson, 153 Neb. 402, 45 N.W.2d 122 (1950).

Abstract of votes cast for President and Vice President are transmitted to Secretary of State by county canvassing board. State ex rel. Beeson v. Marsh, 150 Neb. 233, 34 N.W.2d 279 (1948).